Florida, session 2026, HB7005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 252.385, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
252.385 Public shelter space; public records exemption.—
(5) The address and telephone number of a person provided
public emergency shelter during a storm or catastrophic event
and held by the agency, as defined in s. 119.011, that provided
the emergency shelter is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a),
Art. I of the State Constitution. This subsection is subject to
the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s.
119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless
reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7005-00